New York, session 2025-2026, A161.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the department of labor, in consulta- 2 tion with the commissioners of the office of temporary and disability 3 assistance, the department of health, the office of children and family 4 services, and the department of taxation and finance (hereinafter, "the 5 commissioners"), any other department, division, board, bureau, commis- 6 sion, agency or public authority of the state or any political subdivi- 7 sion thereof deemed necessary by the commissioners, shall prepare a 8 comprehensive study and report on income eligibility limits for public 9 benefits to assist the poor and the impact that rising wages has or will 10 have on the eligibility of the working poor to receive such benefits. 11 Such study shall include an analysis of any effect on the eligibility of 12 working individuals for all programs with an income eligibility require- 13 ment and/or the potential reduction in benefits under such programs, 14 which may occur due to increased wages. The study shall also examine the 15 impact on individuals and families near the poverty level of the loss of 16 services, programs and subsidies and the adequacy of increased wages to 17 cover the costs of such expenses. 18 § 2. The commissioners shall publish such report to the governor, the 19 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 20 minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the assembly, 21 no later than the first day of July of the year succeeding the date on 22 which this act shall have become a law. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00577-01-5